North Carolina, session 2025, HB12.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 81A of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 8.
"Standard Time.
"§ 81A-100. Designation of time.
In accordance with subsection (a) of Section 260a of the Uniform Time Act of 1966 (15
U.S.C. §§ 260-267) the State and its political subdivisions shall observe standard time at all times
throughout the year."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective March 8, 2026.
*H12-v-1*